Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.260

Time for filing action begins when escrow account established.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the civil practice and rules with respect to the timely bringing of an action, the five year period provided for in RCW 7.68.200 shall not begin to run until an escrow account has been established.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.